src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexd
LEXICON Class_I
aak'ab'
chaahim
choxa
choql
chu'ke
hab'
hab'al
hiik
kaaq
priim
q'ehil
q'ojyin
saqb'ach
saq'e
sujen
sujew
kaqlaaq'
kaq'naab'
kontineent
k'ak'naab'
k'anha'
k'ehomaq
k'ub
maqs
nima'
palaw
po
saqoonak
saab'
siwan
tamb'aha'
xokaq'ab'
